Louisiana, session 2026, HB642.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1276 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1276. Congressional districts
Louisiana shall be divided into six congressional districts, and the qualified
electors of each district shall elect one representative to the United States House of
Representatives. The districts shall be composed as follows:
(1) District 1 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14,
15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37,
38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64,
65, 66, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88,
89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 105, 106, 116, 117, 118,
119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125A, 125B, 126, 127, 128, 129, 130, 132, 134, 136,
192, 198, 199, 203, 246, 247, 248, 1-GI, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H, 8-H, 9-H,
1-K, 2-K, 3-K, 4-K, 5-K, 6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 11-K, 12-K,
Page 1 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-957 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 642
13-KA, 14-K, 16-K, 17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 25-K, 27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 34-K, 35-K, and
1-L of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 3-2, 3-3, 3-6, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 4-6, 7-3,
8-1, 9-1, 9-2, 10-1, 10-2, 10-3, 10-4, 10-6, 10-8, 10-9, 10-10, 10-11, 10-12, 10-13,
10-14, 10-15, 10-16, 11-1, and 11-2 of Lafourche Parish; Precincts 3-20, 4-7, 4-8,
4-9, 4-11, 4-14, 4-15, 4-17, 4-17A, 4-18, 4-20, 4-21, 4-22, 4-23, 5-12, 5-15, 5-16,
5-17, 5-18, 7-41, 7-42, 14-3, 14-4, 14-7, 14-8, 14-9, 14-10, 14-11, 14-12, 14-13A,
14-14, 14-15, 14-16, 14-18A, 14-19, 14-21, 16-2, 16-3, 17-1, 17-17, 17-18, 17-18A,
17-19, and 17-20 of Orleans Parish; Plaquemines Parish; St. Bernard Parish; St.
Tammany Parish; Precincts 49, 70, 70A, 71, 72, 72A, 73, 74, 120, 122A, 122B,
122C, 124, 137A, 141A, 145, 147, 149, 149A, and 151 of Tangipahoa Parish; and
Precincts 11, 15, 19, 20, 23, 25, 27, 29, 31, 33, 34, 35, 37, 38, 41, 43, 45, 48, 49, 52,
53, 55, 56, 57, 59, 60, 62, 63, 69, 71, 72, 81, 83, 85, 88, 90, 94, 95, 100, and 110 of
Terrebonne Parish.
(2) District 2 is composed of Precincts 30, 36, 37, 38, 39, 42, 44, 45, 47, 48,
50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, and 57 of Ascension Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 2-5, 4-3, 5-5,
6-1, 6-2, 6-3, and 7-1 of Assumption Parish; Precincts 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 1-10,
1-11, 1-13, 1-14, 1-15, 1-16, 1-18, 1-19, 1-21, 1-22, 1-23, 1-24, 1-25, 1-26, 1-27,
1-28, 1-29, 1-30, 1-31, 1-32, 1-36, 1-50, 1-51, 1-58, 1-61, 1-62, 1-63, 1-67, 1-77,
1-84, 1-85, 1-86, 1-91, 1-92, 1-93, 1-94, 1-95, 1-100, 1-101, 1-104, 2-1, 2-9, 2-11,
2-13, 2-16, 2-20, 2-22, 2-23, 2-24, and 2-30 of East Baton Rouge Parish; Precincts
1, 3, 6, 7, 9, 10, 10B, 11, 12, 14, 14A, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, and 22 of Iberville
Parish; Precincts 104, 108, 115, 131, 133, 138, 150A, 150B, 151, 152, 153, 154, 155,
156, 157A, 170, 171, 172, 173, 174, 175, 176, 177, 178, 179A, 179B, 180, 181, 182,
183, 184, 185A, 185B, 187, 188, 189, 190, 191, 193A, 193B, 194A, 194B, 195, 196,
197A, 197B, 200, 201, 202, 204, 205, 210, 211, 212, 213A, 213B, 213C, 214A,
214B, 215, 216A, 216B, 217, 225, 226, 227, 228, 229, 230, 231, 232A, 232B, 234,
235, 236, 237, 238A, 238B, 1-G, 2-G, 3-G, 4-G, 5-G, 6-G, 7-G, 8-G, 9-G, 10-G,
11-G, 12-G, 13-G, 13-KB, 15-K, 21-K, 22-K, 23-K, 24-K, 26-K, 30-K, 31-K, 33-K,
1-W, 3-W, 4-W, 5-W, 6-W, and 7-W of Jefferson Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-5, 1-6,
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-957 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 642
2-1, 2-2, 2-4, 2-6, 2-7, 3-1, 3-8, 3-9, 3-12, 3-14, 3-15, 3-18, 3-19, 4-2, 4-3, 4-6, 5-1,
5-2, 5-3, 5-5, 5-7, 5-8, 5-9, 5-10, 5-11, 5-13, 6-1, 6-2, 6-4, 6-6, 6-7, 6-8, 6-9, 7-1, 7-2,
7-4, 7-5, 7-6, 7-7, 7-8, 7-9A, 7-10, 7-11, 7-12, 7-13, 7-14, 7-15, 7-16, 7-17, 7-18,
7-19, 7-20, 7-21, 7-23, 7-24, 7-25, 7-25A, 7-26, 7-27, 7-27B, 7-28, 7-28A, 7-29,
7-30, 7-32, 7-33, 7-35, 7-37, 7-37A, 7-40, 8-1, 8-2, 8-4, 8-6, 8-7, 8-8, 8-9, 8-12,
8-13, 8-14, 8-15, 8-19, 8-20, 8-21, 8-22, 8-23, 8-24, 8-25, 8-26, 8-27, 8-28, 8-30, 9-1,
9-3, 9-4, 9-5, 9-6, 9-7, 9-8, 9-9, 9-10, 9-11, 9-12, 9-13, 9-14, 9-15, 9-16, 9-17, 9-19,
9-21, 9-23, 9-25, 9-26, 9-28, 9-28C, 9-29, 9-30, 9-30A, 9-31, 9-31A, 9-31B, 9-31D,
9-32, 9-33, 9-34A, 9-35, 9-35A, 9-36, 9-36B, 9-37, 9-38, 9-38A, 9-39, 9-39B, 9-40,
9-40A, 9-40C, 9-41, 9-41A, 9-41B, 9-41C, 9-41D, 9-42, 9-42C, 9-43A, 9-43B,
9-43C, 9-43E, 9-43F, 9-43G, 9-43H, 9-43I, 9-43J, 9-43K, 9-43L, 9-43M, 9-43N,
9-44, 9-44A, 9-44B, 9-44D, 9-44E, 9-44F, 9-44G, 9-44I, 9-44J, 9-44L, 9-44M,
9-44N, 9-44O, 9-44P, 9-44Q, 9-45, 9-45A, 10-3, 10-6, 10-7, 10-8, 10-9, 10-11,
10-12, 10-13, 10-14, 11-2, 11-3, 11-4, 11-5, 11-8, 11-9, 11-10, 11-11, 11-12, 11-13,
11-14, 11-17, 12-1, 12-2, 12-3, 12-4, 12-5, 12-6, 12-7, 12-9, 12-10, 12-11, 12-12,
12-13, 12-14, 12-16, 12-17, 12-19, 13-1, 13-2, 13-3, 13-4, 13-5, 13-6, 13-7, 13-8,
13-9, 13-10, 13-11, 13-12, 13-13, 13-14, 13-15, 13-16, 14-1, 14-2, 14-5, 14-6, 14-17,
14-20, 14-23, 14-24A, 14-25, 14-26, 15-1, 15-2, 15-3, 15-5, 15-6, 15-8, 15-9, 15-10,
15-11, 15-12, 15-12A, 15-13, 15-13A, 15-13B, 15-14, 15-14A, 15-14B, 15-14C,
15-14D, 15-14E, 15-14F, 15-14G, 15-15, 15-15A, 15-15B, 15-16, 15-17, 15-17A,
15-17B, 15-18, 15-18A, 15-18B, 15-18C, 15-18D, 15-18E, 15-18F, 15-19, 15-19A,
15-19B, 15-19C, 16-1, 16-1A, 16-4, 16-5, 16-6, 16-7, 16-8, 16-9, 17-2, 17-3, 17-4,
17-5, 17-6, 17-7, 17-8, 17-9, 17-10, 17-11, 17-12, 17-13, 17-13A, 17-14, 17-15, and
17-16 of Orleans Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 2-1, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 4-1, 4-2,
4-3, 4-4, 4-5, 5-1, 5-3, 5-4, 6-3, 6-6, 7-1, 7-2, 7-3, 7-4, and 7-5 of St. Charles Parish;
St. James Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 3-1, 3-2,
3-3, 3-4, 3-7, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 7-1, and 7-4 of St. John
the Baptist Parish; and Precincts 1A, 1B, 1C, 1D, 1E, 4B, 6, 7A, 7B, 8, 10, 13A, 13B,
14A, and 15 of West Baton Rouge Parish.
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-957 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 642
(3) District 3 is composed of Acadia Parish; Calcasieu Parish; Cameron
Parish; Iberia Parish; Jefferson Davis Parish; Lafayette Parish; Precincts 3, 4, 5, 6,
7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30,
31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, and 43 of St. Martin Parish; Precincts
1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 6A, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 25,
26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 42, 43, and 44 of St. Mary
Parish; and Vermilion Parish.
(4) District 4 is composed of Allen Parish; Beauregard Parish; Bienville
Parish; Bossier Parish; Caddo Parish; Claiborne Parish; De Soto Parish; Evangeline
Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 2-1, 2-2, 2-3, 2-5, 3-1, 3-2, 5-3, and 7-1 of Grant
Parish; Natchitoches Parish; Red River Parish; Sabine Parish; St. Landry Parish;
Union Parish; Vernon Parish; and Webster Parish.
(5) District 5 is composed of Avoyelles Parish; Caldwell Parish; Catahoula
Parish; Concordia Parish; East Carroll Parish; East Feliciana Parish; Franklin Parish;
Precincts 2-6, 3-3, 4-1, 4-2, 4-3, 5-1, 5-2, 6-1, 6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 7-2, 7-3, 7-5, 7-6, 8-1,
8-2, 8-3, and 8-4 of Grant Parish; Jackson Parish; La Salle Parish; Lincoln Parish;
Madison Parish; Morehouse Parish; Ouachita Parish; Pointe Coupee Parish; Rapides
Parish; Richland Parish; St. Helena Parish; Precincts 2, 6, 11, 15, 16, 17, 28, 33, 40A,
41, 42, 43, 44, 45A, 45B, 46, 47, 101, 102, 104, 106, 106A, 107, 108, 109, 110,
111A, 112, 114, 115B, 116, 117, 118, 118A, 119, 120A, 120B, 121, 121A, 123, 125,
127, 129A, 133, 133A, 137, 137B, 137C, 137D, 139, 141, 143, and 143A of
Tangipahoa Parish; Tensas Parish; Washington Parish; West Carroll Parish; West
Feliciana Parish; and Winn Parish.
(6) District 6 is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13,
14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 40, 41, 43,
58, 61, 62, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 71, 72, 73, 76, 77, and 78 of Ascension Parish;
Precincts 1-3, 2-1, 2-3, 2-4, 3-1, 3-2, 4-1, 4-4, 5-1, 5-2, 5-3, 7-2, 7-3, 8-1, and 9-1 of
Assumption Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-7, 1-8, 1-9, 1-12, 1-20, 1-33, 1-34, 1-35, 1-37,
1-38, 1-39, 1-40, 1-41, 1-42, 1-43, 1-44, 1-45, 1-46, 1-47, 1-48, 1-49, 1-52, 1-53,
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-957 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 642
1-54, 1-55, 1-56, 1-57, 1-59, 1-60, 1-64, 1-65, 1-66, 1-69, 1-70, 1-71, 1-72, 1-73,
1-74, 1-75, 1-76, 1-78, 1-79, 1-80, 1-81, 1-82, 1-83, 1-87, 1-88, 1-89, 1-90, 1-96,
1-97, 1-98, 1-99, 1-102, 1-103, 1-105, 1-106, 1-107, 2-2, 2-3, 2-4, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8,
2-10, 2-12, 2-14, 2-15, 2-17, 2-18, 2-19, 2-21, 2-25, 2-26, 2-27, 2-28, 2-29, 2-31,
2-32, 2-33, 2-34, 2-35, 2-36, 2-37, 2-38, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-4, 3-5, 3-6, 3-7, 3-8, 3-9,
3-10, 3-11, 3-12, 3-13, 3-14, 3-15, 3-16, 3-17, 3-18, 3-19, 3-20, 3-21, 3-22, 3-23,
3-24, 3-25, 3-26, 3-27, 3-28, 3-29, 3-30, 3-31, 3-32, 3-33, 3-34, 3-35, 3-36, 3-37,
3-38, 3-39, 3-40, 3-41, 3-42, 3-43, 3-44, 3-45, 3-46, 3-47, 3-48, 3-49, 3-50, 3-51,
3-52, 3-53, 3-54, 3-55, 3-56, 3-57, 3-58, 3-59, 3-60, 3-61, 3-62, 3-63, 3-64, 3-65,
3-66, 3-67, 3-68, 3-69, 3-70, 3-71, 3-72, 3-73, 3-74, 3-75, and 3-76 of East Baton
Rouge Parish; Precincts 4, 5, 13, 15A, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 31, and 32 of Iberville
Parish; Precincts 1-1, 1-2, 1-3, 1-4, 1-5, 1-6, 2-1, 2-1A, 2-2, 2-3, 2-5, 2-6, 2-7, 2-8,
2-9, 2-10, 2-11, 2-12, 2-13, 2-14, 2-15, 2-16, 3-1, 3-4, 3-5, 5-1, 5-1A, 5-2, 5-3, 6-1,
6-2, 6-3, 6-4, 6-5, 7-1, 7-2, 7-4, 11-3, 11-4, and 11-5 of Lafourche Parish; Livingston
Parish; Precincts 1-6, 2-6, 3-1, 3-2, 3-3, 5-5, 6-1, 6-2, and 6-4 of St. Charles Parish;
Precincts 1-6, 1-7, 4-4, 4-5, 5-4, 5-5, 6-5, 7-2, and 7-3 of St. John the Baptist Parish;
Precincts 1 and 2 of St. Martin Parish; Precincts 24, 41, and 45 of St. Mary Parish;
Precincts 1, 2, 5, 7, 8, 10, 12, 14, 16, 17, 18, 28, 39, 42, 51, 64, 67, 68, 73, 76, 84,
and 87 of Terrebonne Parish; and Precincts 2A, 2B, 3, 4A, 5, 9, 14B, 16, 17, 18, 19,
20, 21, and 22 of West Baton Rouge Parish.
Section 2. R.S. 18:1276.1 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (1-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana Senate and the Louisiana House of
Representatives to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-957 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 642
Legislature of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
18:532 and 532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall not reduce the term of office of any
person holding any position or office on the effective date of this Section for which the
appointment or election is based upon a congressional district as composed pursuant to R.S.
18:1276.1. Any position or office that is filled by appointment or election based upon a
congressional district and that is to be filled after January 3, 2029, shall be appointed or
elected from a district as it is described in Section 1 of this Act.
Section 5.(A) Solely for the purposes of qualifying for election and the conduct of
the election of representatives to the United States Congress at the regularly scheduled
election for representatives to the congress in 2028, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act
shall become effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the
governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the
governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act
is vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of
Section 1 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval for the
purposes established in this Subsection.
(B) For subsequent elections of representatives to the United States Congress and
for all other purposes, the provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective at noon
on January 3, 2029.
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-957 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 642
(C) The provisions of Section 2 of this Act shall become effective at noon on
January 3, 2029.
(D) The provisions of this Section and Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become
effective upon signature of this Act by the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon
expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature by the governor, as provided
in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If this Act is vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section and
Sections 3 and 4 of this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.